Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201958-837
Authority; combine and substitute projects; bonds; additional series.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act, the authority may combine for financing purposes, with the consent of all of the eligible institutions which are involved, the project or projects and some or all future projects of any eligible institutions, but the money set aside in any fund or funds pledged for any series or issue of bonds shall be held for the sole benefit of such series or issue separate and apart from any money pledged for any other series or issue of bonds of the authority. To facilitate the combining of projects, bonds may be issued in series under one or more resolutions or trust indentures and be fully open end, thus providing for the unlimited issuance of additional series, or partially open end, limited as to additional series, all in the discretion of the authority. Notwithstanding any other provision of the act to the contrary, the authority may, in its discretion, permit an eligible institution to substitute one or more projects of equal value, as determined by an independent appraiser satisfactory to the authority, for any project financed under the act on such terms and subject to such conditions as the authority may prescribe.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2934;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 34;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1734;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 37;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 20.